Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-154
Directors; salaries and expenses; officers, employees, attorneys, and agents; compensation.

The board of directors shall provide a payment for each director of not to exceed seventy dollars per day for each day that a director attends meetings of the board or is engaged in matters concerning the district, but not to exceed two thousand eight hundred dollars per annum. Each director shall also be paid necessary traveling expenses actually incurred while engaged in the performance of his or her duties, including mileage at the rate provided in section 81-1176. The board shall fix the compensation to be paid to the other officers named in sections 46-101 to 46-1,111, including the secretary, the assessor, and the treasurer to be paid out of the treasury of the district. The board may also employ a chief engineer, an attorney, and such other agents, assistants, and employees as may be necessary and provide for their compensation.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 26, p. 288;

Laws 1897, c. 86, § 7, p. 365;

R.S.1913, § 3484;

C.S.1922, § 2884;

C.S.1929, § 46-129;

R.S.1943, § 46-154;

Laws 1951, c. 149, § 1, p. 597;

Laws 1961, c. 226, § 1, p. 670;

Laws 1979, LB 282, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 75;

Laws 2000, LB 901, § 2.